Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.150

Juror expense payments—Reimbursement by state—Pilot projects.

Jurors shall receive for each day's attendance, besides mileage at the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060, the following expense payments:

(1) Grand jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars;

(2) Petit jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars;

(3) Coroner's jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars;

(4) District court jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no case less than ten dollars:

PROVIDED, That a person excused from jury service at his or her own request shall be allowed not more than a per diem and such mileage, if any, as to the court shall seem just and equitable under all circumstances: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state shall fully reimburse the county in which trial is held for all jury fees and witness fees related to criminal cases which result from incidents occurring within an adult or juvenile correctional institution: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the expense payments paid to jurors shall be determined by the county legislative authority and shall be uniformly applied within the county.

For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, jurors participating in pilot projects in superior, district, and municipal courts may receive juror fees of up to sixty-two dollars for each day of attendance in addition to mileage reimbursement at the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060.

[ 2006 c 372 s 903; 2004 c 127 s 1; 1987 c 202 s 105; 1979 ex.s. c 135 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 76 s 1; 1959 c 73 s 1; 1951 c 51 s 2; 1943 c 188 s 1; 1933 c 52 s 1; 1927 c 171 s 1; 1907 c 56 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4229. Prior: 1903 c 151 s 1, part; 1893 p 421 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2086, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2006 c 372: See notes following RCW 73.04.135.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 135: See note following RCW 2.36.080.

Travel expense in lieu of mileage in certain cases: RCW 2.40.030.